Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 8
PEDESTRIANS

Cross references:

For penalties for class A and class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-801. Pedestrian obedience to traffic control devices and traffic regulations.

A pedestrian shall obey the instructions of any official traffic control device specifically applicable to the pedestrian, unless otherwise directed by a police officer.

Pedestrians shall be subject to traffic and pedestrian-control signals as provided in sections 42-4-604 and 42-4-802 (5).

At all other places, pedestrians shall be accorded the privileges and shall be subject to the restrictions stated in this title.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2352, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-701 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-801 was relocated to § 42-4-901.

42-4-802. Pedestrians' right-of-way in crosswalks.

When traffic control signals are not in place or not in operation, the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way, slowing down or stopping if need be to so yield, to a pedestrian crossing the roadway within a crosswalk when the pedestrian is upon the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling or when the pedestrian is approaching so closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in danger.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply under the conditions stated in section 42-4-803.

A pedestrian shall not suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and ride a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter, or walk or run into the path of a moving vehicle that is so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.

Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway, the driver of any other vehicle approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass such stopped vehicle.

Whenever special pedestrian-control signals exhibiting "Walk" or "Don't Walk" word or symbol indications are in place, as declared in the traffic control manual adopted by the department of transportation, such signals shall indicate and require as follows:

"Walk" (steady): While the "Walk" indication is steadily illuminated, pedestrians facing such signal may proceed across the roadway in the direction of the signal indication and shall be given the right-of-way by the drivers of all vehicles.

"Don't Walk" (steady): While the "Don't Walk" indication is steadily illuminated, no pedestrian shall enter the roadway in the direction of the signal indication.

"Don't Walk" (flashing): Whenever the "Don't Walk" indication is flashing, no pedestrian shall start to cross the roadway in the direction of such signal indication, but any pedestrian who has partly completed crossing during the "Walk" indication shall proceed to a sidewalk or to a safety island, and all drivers of vehicles shall yield to any such pedestrian.

Whenever a signal system provides for the stopping of all vehicular traffic and the exclusive movement of pedestrians and "Walk" and "Don't Walk" signal indications control such pedestrian movement, pedestrians may cross in any direction between corners of the intersection offering the shortest route within the boundaries of the intersection while the "Walk" indication is exhibited, if signals and other official devices direct pedestrian movement in such manner consistent with section 42-4-803 (4).

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2352, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 1354, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1277, § 53, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2561, § 9, effective May 23.

42-4-803. Crossing at other than crosswalks.

Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at any point other than within a marked crosswalk or within an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Any pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing has been provided shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Between adjacent intersections at which traffic control signals are in operation, pedestrians shall not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk.

No pedestrian shall cross a roadway intersection diagonally unless authorized by official traffic control devices; and, when authorized to cross diagonally, pedestrians shall cross only in accordance with the official traffic control devices pertaining to such crossing movements.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2353, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-703 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-803 was relocated to § 42-4-903.

42-4-804. Pedestrian to use right half of crosswalk. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2354, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

Entire section repealed, p. 564, § 29, effective April 24.

42-4-805. Pedestrians walking or traveling in a wheelchair on highways.

Pedestrians walking or traveling in a wheelchair along and upon highways where sidewalks are not provided shall walk or travel only on a road shoulder as far as practicable from the edge of the roadway. Where neither a sidewalk nor road shoulder is available, any pedestrian walking or traveling in a wheelchair along and upon a highway shall walk as near as practicable to an outside edge of the roadway and, in the case of a two-way roadway, shall walk or travel only on the left side of the roadway facing traffic that may approach from the opposite direction; except that any person lawfully soliciting a ride may stand on either side of such two-way roadway where there is a view of traffic approaching from both directions.

No person shall stand in a roadway for the purpose of soliciting a ride from the driver of any private vehicle. For the purposes of this subsection (2), "roadway" means that portion of the road normally used by moving motor vehicle traffic.

It is unlawful for any person who is under the influence of alcohol or of any controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., or of any stupefying drug to walk or be upon that portion of any highway normally used by moving motor vehicle traffic.

This section applying to pedestrians shall also be applicable to riders of animals.

Any city or town may, by ordinance, regulate the use by pedestrians of streets and highways under its jurisdiction to the extent authorized under subsection (6) of this section and sections 42-4-110 and 42-4-111, but no ordinance regulating such use of streets and highways in a manner differing from this section shall be effective until official signs or devices giving notice thereof have been placed as required by section 42-4-111 (2).

No person shall solicit a ride on any highway included in the interstate system, as defined in section 43-2-101 (2), C.R.S., except at an entrance to or exit from such highway or at places specifically designated by the department of transportation; or, in an emergency affecting a vehicle or its operation, a driver or passenger of a disabled vehicle may solicit a ride on any highway.

Pedestrians shall only be picked up where there is adequate road space for vehicles to pull off and not endanger and impede the flow of traffic.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle making use of audible or visual signals meeting the requirements of section 42-4-213 or of a police vehicle properly and lawfully making use of an audible signal only, every pedestrian shall yield the right-of-way to the authorized emergency vehicle and shall leave the roadway and remain off the same until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a police officer. This subsection (8) shall not relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to use due care as provided in sections 42-4-108 (4) and 42-4-807.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2354, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(8) amended, p. 959, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1632, § 90, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-706 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For obstruction of highway or other passageway, see § 18-9-107.

42-4-806. Driving through safety zone prohibited.

No vehicle at any time shall be driven through or within a safety zone. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2355, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-706 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-807. Drivers to exercise due care.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this article, every driver of a vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian upon any roadway and shall give warning by sounding the horn when necessary and shall exercise proper precaution upon observing any child or any obviously confused or incapacitated person upon a roadway. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2355, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-707 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-808. Drivers and pedestrians, other than persons in wheelchairs, to yield to individuals with disabilities.

Any pedestrian, other than a person in a wheelchair, or any driver of a vehicle who approaches an individual who has an obviously apparent disability shall immediately come to a full stop and take such precautions before proceeding as are necessary to avoid an accident or injury to said individual. A disability shall be deemed to be obviously apparent if, by way of example and without limitation, the individual is using a mobility device, is assisted by a service animal, as defined in section 24-34-301, C.R.S., is being assisted by another person, or is walking with an obvious physical impairment. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic offense.

The department has no authority to assess any points under section 42-2-127 to any pedestrian who is convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2355, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 325, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-118), ch. 250, p. 987, § 26, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-709 as it existed prior to 1994.